Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.050

Meetings.

The board must meet at least once yearly or more frequently upon call of the chair or the secretary of health at such times and places as the chair or the secretary of health may designate by giving three days' notice or as otherwise required by RCW 42.30.075. A full record of the board's proceedings shall be kept in the office of the board and shall be open to inspection at all reasonable times.

[ 2023 c 400 s 2; 2011 c 336 s 491; 1991 c 3 s 139; 1989 c 175 s 65; 1979 c 158 s 48; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 9; 1963 c 25 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.